Illinois, session 104th, SB3422.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Healthy Forests, Wetlands, and Prairies Act 5is amended by changing Section 20 as follows: 6    (525 ILCS 22/20)7    Sec. 20. Establishment of the Healthy Forests, Wetlands, 8and Prairies Grant Program. 9    (a) The Department of Natural Resources, subject to 10appropriation, shall establish and administer a Healthy 11Forests, Wetlands, and Prairies Grant Program to restore 12degraded forest lands and native prairies and to promote the 13growth of native vegetation that removes carbon dioxide from 14the atmosphere and helps mitigate the impact of climate 15change.16    (b) Entities that may apply to participate in the Healthy 17Forests, Wetlands, and Prairies Grant Program include:18        (1) State agencies and units of local government, 19    including, but not limited to, municipalities, townships, 20    counties, forest preserves, and park districts;21        (2) conservation land trusts;22        (3) not-for-profit entities with conservation 23    missions, including, but not limited to, climate change   SB3422 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19544 BDA 32992 b1    mitigation, preservation of natural lands, and 2    conservation of the State's natural resources; and3        (4) other entities that, because of their missions, 4    are determined by the Department to be eligible recipients 5    of the grants under this Act.6    (c) At least 75% of the moneys appropriated for the 7Healthy Forests, Wetlands, and Prairies Grant Program shall be 8awarded to the State agencies, units of local government, land 9trusts, and other entities that the Department determines are 10eligible for a grant under this Section. The Department may 11use an amount not to exceed 23% of the moneys appropriated for 12the Program for the purposes of restoring degraded forest 13lands, and native prairies, and wetlands with the goal of 14promoting and to promote the growth of native vegetation that 15remove carbon dioxide from the atmosphere and help mitigate 16the impact of climate change. The Department may use an amount 17not to exceed 2% of the moneys appropriated for the Healthy 18Forests, Wetlands, and Prairies Grant Program for 19administrative costs associated with the Program. All grants 20issued under this Act shall be cost-share grants. The 21cost-share approved by the Department may include in-kind 22contributions of the applicant. The grants issued under this 23Act may be used as matching funds for federal grant awards 24whose purpose is in line with this Act. 25    (d) The Department shall adopt any rules necessary for the 26implementation of this Act, including rules establishing   SB3422 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 19544 BDA 32992 b1requirements and timeframes for the submission of grant 2applications by entities that are authorized to apply to 3participate in the Healthy Forests, Wetlands, and Prairies 4Grant Program as well as cost-share amounts or in-kind 5contributions for the activities authorized under any grant 6issued pursuant to this Act.7    (e) Grants provided under this Act may be used by eligible 8entities for the purpose of purchasing and : (1) matching funds 9for federal or private dollars for projects that forward the 10goal of climate change mitigation through promotion of the 11management, planting, maintaining, and preserving of native 12grasses, plants, and trees. ; 13    (f) The Department shall set by administrative rule, the 14prioritization and criteria used for awarding grants under 15this Act. Those priorities shall include, but not be limited 16to: 17        (1) projects for the purchasing and planting of native 18    grasses, plants, and trees (2) financing projects along 19    roadways, and in parks, in and forest preserves, or on 20    public or private lands and where native grasses, plants, 21    or trees are not currently planted to plant native trees 22    and prairie grasses demonstrated to absorb carbon; 23        (2) (3) financing projects that promote the 24    stewardship of existing public and private urban forests, 25    prairies, and wetlands that include and natural lands, 26    including the removal of invasive or nonnative plant   SB3422 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 19544 BDA 32992 b1    species in addition to the planting of native grasses, 2    plants, and trees where such native species are not 3    currently growing; or 4        (3) projects for the purchase and planting of native 5    grasses, plants, and trees for the purpose of shoreline 6    restoration and protection projects on behalf of counties, 7    municipalities, and park districts. (4) funding regional 8    teams tasked with planting native prairie grasses and 9    trees, prescribed burning for the maintenance of natural 10    lands, removing invasive plant species, and educational 11    outreach;12    Additionally, the Department may issue additional funds in 13an awarded grant for (5) promoting, education, and marketing 14regarding local projects that will be funded by a grant issued 15pursuant to this Act. Those public outreach efforts must 16include projects or steps community members may take to 17promote the growth of native vegetation that removes carbon 18dioxide from the atmosphere. ; and19        (6) financing shoreline restoration and protection 20    projects on behalf of counties and park districts. 21(Source: P.A. 103-923, eff. 1-1-25; 104-143, eff. 1-1-26.)